Utah statutes.
31A-22-1703.   Filing of form.

(1)  Notwithstanding Section 31A-21-201, a person may not:

(a)  prepare, issue, or request the issuance of a certificate of insurance unless the certificate of insurance form is filed with the commissioner; or

(b)  modify a filed certificate of insurance form unless filed with the commissioner.

(2)  The commissioner shall object to the use of, or prohibit the use of, a certificate of insurance form filed under this section if the certificate of insurance form:

(a)  is unfair, misleading, or deceptive;

(b)  violates public policy;

(c)  fails to comply with Section 31A-22-1704; or

(d)  violates any law, including a rule made by the commissioner in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

(3)  A standard certificate of insurance form filed for use by a nationally recognized insurance rating organization that is licensed by the commissioner, is considered filed for use for purposes of this section or Section 31A-21-201.



Enacted by Chapter 253, 2011 General Session

